District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.05

Use of living persons’ names prohibited; use of deceased persons’ names restricted.

Except as provided in § 9-204.10, no public space in the District shall be named in honor of any living person, or in honor of any person who has been deceased less than 2 years, unless the deceased person was a President or Vice President of the United States, a United States Senator or Representative, a Mayor of the District of Columbia, or a member of the Council of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 405, 30 DCR 148
Feb. 26, 2016, D.C. Law 21-68, § 2(a), 62 DCR 16266
1981 Ed., § 7-455.
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-68 added “Except as provided in § 9-204.10” in the first sentence.
For temporary (225 day) acceptance of dedication, see § 2 of Dedication and Designation of Harry Thomas Way Temporary Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-251, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4164).
For temporary designation of minor street as “Harry Thomas Way”, see § 2(b) of the Dedication and Designation of Harry Thomas Way Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-579, January 12, 1999, 45 DCR 966).
For designation of certain dedicated land, see § 2(b) of the Dedication and Designation of Harry Thomas Way, N.E. Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-198, December 1, 1999, 46 DCR 10444).
For designation of certain dedicated land, see § 2(b) of the Dedication and Designation of Harry Thomas Way, N.E. Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-277, March 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2017).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of section, see § 2(a) of the Athletic Field Naming and Sponsorship Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-201, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15274).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(a) of the Athletic Field Naming and Sponsorship Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-302, Feb. 18, 2016, 63 DCR 2171).